dev/transliterate/lat-kaz.twol
Alphabet
a:а
b:б
c:ц c:с
d:д
e:е
f:ф
g:г
y:0
y:й
a:я
 ;

Sets
lats = a b c d e f g ;

Rules

"ya 1"
y:0 <=> _ :я ;

"ya 2"
a:я <=> y:0 _ ;

"ya 3"
y:й <=> [a | e | #.#] _ [ a | e | .#. ] ;

"ya 4"
a:а /<= y: _ ;

! y a -> я
